California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(7) Rescuing any person or property in the custody of an officer by virtue of an order or process of that court.

(8) Unlawfully detaining a witness or party to an action while going to, remaining at, or returning from the court where the action is on the calendar for trial.

(9) Any other unlawful interference with the process or proceedings of a court.

(10) Disobedience of a subpoena duly served, or refusing to be sworn or answer as a witness.

(11) When summoned as a juror in a court, neglecting to attend or serve as a juror, or improperly conversing with a party to an action to be tried at the court, or with
 any other person, in relation to the merits of the action, or receiving a communication from a party or other person in respect to the action, without immediately disclosing the communication to the court.

(12) Disobedience by an inferior tribunal or judicial officer of the lawful judgment, order, or process of a superior court, or proceeding in an action or special proceeding contrary to law, after the action or special proceeding is removed from the jurisdiction of the inferior tribunal or judicial officer.

(b) A speech or publication reflecting upon or concerning a court or an officer thereof shall not be treated or punished as a contempt of the court unless made in the immediate presence of the court while in session and in such a manner as to actually interfere with its proceedings.

(c) Notwithstanding Section
 1211 or any other law, if an order of contempt is made affecting an attorney, his or her agent, investigator, or any person acting under the attorney’s direction, in the preparation and conduct of an action or proceeding, the execution of any sentence shall be stayed pending the filing within three judicial days of a petition for extraordinary relief testing the lawfulness of the court’s order, the violation of which is the basis of the contempt, except for conduct proscribed by subdivision (b) of Section 6068 of the Business and Professions Code, relating to an attorney’s duty to maintain respect due to the courts and judicial officers.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 1211 or any other law, if an order of contempt is made affecting a public safety employee acting within the scope of employment for reason of the employee’s failure to comply with a duly issued subpoena or subpoena duces tecum, the execution of any sentence shall be stayed pending
 the filing within three judicial days of a petition for extraordinary relief testing the lawfulness of the court’s order, a violation of which is the basis for the contempt.

As used in this subdivision, “public safety employee” includes any peace officer, firefighter, paramedic, or any other employee of a public law enforcement agency whose duty is either to maintain official records or to analyze or present evidence for investigative or prosecutorial purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 181, Sec. 3.   (AB 141)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1209.5.

When a court of competent jurisdiction makes an order compelling a parent to furnish support or necessary food, clothing, shelter, medical attendance, or other remedial care for his or her child, proof that the order was made, filed, and served on the parent or proof that the parent was present in court at the time the order was pronounced and proof that the parent did not comply with the order is prima facie evidence of a contempt of court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.

Every person dispossessed or ejected from any real property by the judgment or process of any court of competent jurisdiction, who, not having right so to do, reenters into or upon or takes possession of the real property, or induces or procures any person not having right so to do, or aids or abets such a person therein, is guilty of a contempt of the court by which the judgment was rendered or from which the process issued. Upon a conviction for contempt the court must immediately issue an alias process, directed to the proper officer, and requiring the officer to restore possession to the party entitled under the original judgment or process, or to
 the party’s lessee, grantee, or successor in interest. No appeal from the order directing the issuance of an alias writ of possession stays the execution of the writ, unless an undertaking is executed on the part of the appellant to the effect that the appellant will not commit or suffer to be committed any waste on the property, and if the order is affirmed, or the appeal dismissed, the appellant will pay the value of the use and occupation of the property from the time of the unlawful reentry until the delivery of the possession of the property, pursuant to the judgment or order, not exceeding a sum to be fixed by the judge of the court by which the order for the alias writ was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 179.)
-------------------------------------------

1211.

(a) When a contempt is committed in the immediate view and presence of the court, or of the judge at chambers, it may be punished summarily; for which an order must be made, reciting the facts as occurring in such immediate view and presence, adjudging that the person proceeded against is thereby guilty of a contempt, and that he or she be punished as therein prescribed.

When the contempt is not committed in the immediate view and presence of the court, or of the judge at chambers, an affidavit shall
 be presented to the court or judge of the facts constituting the contempt, or a statement of the facts by the referees or arbitrators, or other judicial officers.

(b) In family law matters, filing of the Judicial Council form entitled “Order to Show Cause and Affidavit for Contempt (Family Law)” shall constitute compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 754, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1211.5.

At all stages of all proceedings, the affidavit or statement of facts, as the case may be, required by Section 1211 shall be construed, amended, and reviewed according to the followings rules:

(a) If no objection is made to the sufficiency of such affidavit or statement during the hearing on the charges contained therein, jurisdiction of the subject matter shall not depend on the averments of such affidavit or statement, but may be established by the facts found by the trial court to have been proved at such hearing, and the court shall cause the affidavit or statement to be amended to conform to proof.

(b) The court may order or permit amendment of such affidavit or statement for any defect or insufficiency at any stage of the proceedings, and the trial of the person accused of contempt shall continue as if the affidavit or statement had been originally filed as amended, unless substantial rights of such person accused would be prejudiced thereby, in which event a reasonable postponement, not longer than the ends of justice require, may be granted.

(c) No such affidavit or statement is insufficient, nor can the trial, order, judgment, or other proceeding thereon be affected by reason of any defect or imperfection in matter of form which does not prejudice a substantial right of the person accused on the merits. No order or judgment of conviction of contempt shall be set aside, nor new trial granted, for any error as to any matter of pleading in such affidavit or statement, unless,
 after an examination of the entire cause, including the evidence, the court shall be of the opinion that the error complained of has resulted in a miscarriage of justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1264.)
-------------------------------------------

1212.

When the contempt is not committed in the immediate view and presence of the court or judge, a warrant of attachment may be issued to bring the person charged to answer, or, without a previous arrest, a warrant of commitment may, upon notice, or upon an order to show cause, be granted; and no warrant of commitment can be issued without such previous attachment to answer, or such notice or order to show cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1737.)
-------------------------------------------

1213.

Whenever a warrant of attachment is issued pursuant to this title the court or judge must direct, by an endorsement on the warrant, that the person charged may give an undertaking for the person’s appearance in an amount to be specified in such endorsement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 179.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1214.

Upon executing the warrant of attachment, the officer executing the warrant must keep the person in custody, bring him before the court or judge, and detain him until an order be made in the premises, unless the person arrested entitle himself to be discharged, as provided in the next section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1737.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.

The person arrested must be discharged from the arrest upon executing and delivering to the officer, at any time before the return day of the warrant, an undertaking to the effect that the person arrested will appear on the return of the warrant and abide the order of the court or judge thereupon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.

The officer must return the warrant of arrest and undertaking, if any, received by him from the person arrested, by the return day specified therein.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1217.

When the person arrested has been brought up or appeared, the court or judge must proceed to investigate the charge, and must hear any answer which the person arrested may make to the same, and may examine witnesses for or against him, for which an adjournment may be had from time to time if necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1737.)
-------------------------------------------

1218.

(a) Upon the answer and evidence taken, the court or judge shall determine whether the person proceeded against is guilty of the contempt charged, and if it be adjudged that the person is guilty of the contempt, a fine may be imposed on
 the person not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), payable to the court, or the person may be imprisoned not exceeding five days, or both. In addition, a person who is subject to a court order as a party to the action, or any agent of this person, who is adjudged guilty of contempt for violating that court order may be ordered to pay to the party initiating the contempt proceeding the reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred by this party in connection with the contempt proceeding.

(b) Any party, who is in contempt of a court order or judgment in a dissolution of marriage, dissolution of domestic partnership, or legal separation action, shall not be permitted to enforce such an order or judgment, by way of execution or otherwise, either in the same action or by way of a separate action, against the other party. This restriction shall not affect nor apply to the enforcement of child or spousal support orders.

(c) (1) In any court action in which a party is found in contempt of court for failure to comply with a court order pursuant to the Family Code, the court shall, subject to the sentencing option provided in paragraph (2), order the following:

(A) Upon a
 first finding of contempt, the court shall order the contemner to perform community service of up to 120 hours, or to be imprisoned up to 120 hours, for each count of contempt.

(B) Upon the second finding of contempt, the court shall order the contemner to perform community service of up to 120 hours, in addition to ordering imprisonment of the contemner up to 120 hours, for each count of contempt.

(C) Upon the third or any subsequent finding of contempt, the court shall order
 that the contemner serve a term of imprisonment of up to 240 hours and
 perform community service of up to 240 hours, for each count of contempt. The court shall also order the contemner to pay an administrative fee, not to exceed the actual cost of the contemner’s administration and supervision, while assigned to a community service program pursuant to this paragraph.

(D) The court shall take parties’ employment schedules into consideration when ordering either community service or imprisonment, or both.

(2) In lieu of an order of imprisonment, community service, or both, as set forth in paragraph (1), the court may grant probation or a conditional sentence for a period not to exceed one year upon a first finding of contempt, a period not to exceed two years upon a second finding of contempt, and a period not to exceed three years
 upon a third or any subsequent finding of contempt.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “probation” and “conditional sentence” shall have the meanings set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 1203 of the Penal Code.

(d) Pursuant to Section 1211 and this section, a district attorney or city attorney may initiate and pursue a court action for contempt against a party for failing to comply with a court order entered pursuant to the Domestic Violence Protection Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Family Code). Any attorney’s fees and costs ordered by the court pursuant to subdivision (a) against a party who is adjudged guilty of contempt under this subdivision shall be paid to the Office of Emergency Services’ account established for the purpose of funding domestic violence
 shelter service providers pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 13823.15 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 283, Sec. 1.   (AB 2338)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1218.5.

(a) If the contempt alleged is for failure to pay child, family, or spousal support, each month for which payment has not been made in full may be alleged as a separate count of contempt and punishment imposed for each count proven.

(b) If the contempt alleged is the failure to pay child, family, or spousal support, the period of limitations for commencing a contempt action is three years from the date that the payment was due. If the action before the court is enforcement of
 another order under the Family Code, the period of limitations for commencing a contempt action is two years from the time that the alleged contempt occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 3.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1219.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), if the contempt consists of the omission to perform an act which is yet in the power of the person to perform, he or she may be imprisoned until he or she has performed it, and in that case the act shall be specified in the warrant of commitment.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a court shall not imprison
 or otherwise confine or place in custody the victim of a sexual assault or domestic violence crime for contempt if the contempt consists of refusing to testify concerning that sexual assault or domestic violence crime. Before finding a victim of a domestic violence crime in contempt as described in this section, the court may refer the victim for consultation with a domestic violence counselor. All communications between the victim and the domestic violence counselor that occur as a result of that referral shall remain confidential under Section 1037.2 of the Evidence Code.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a court shall not imprison, hold in physical confinement, or otherwise confine or place in custody a minor for contempt if the contempt consists of the minor’s failure to comply with a court order pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 601 of, or Section 727 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, if the minor was adjudged a ward of the
 court on the ground that he or she is a person described in subdivision (b) of Section 601 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Upon a finding of contempt of court, the court may issue any other lawful order, as necessary, to secure the minor’s attendance at school.

(d) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Sexual assault” means any act made punishable by Section 261, 262, 264.1, 285, 286, 287, 288, or 289 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code.

(2) “Domestic violence” means “domestic violence” as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code.

(3) “Domestic violence counselor” means “domestic violence counselor” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(4) “Physical confinement” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 726 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 9.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1219.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), in any case in which a contempt consists of the refusal of a minor under 16 years of age to take the oath or to testify, before imposing any sanction for the contempt, the court shall first refer the matter to the probation officer in charge of matters coming before the juvenile court for a report and recommendation as to the appropriateness of the imposition of
 a sanction. The probation officer shall prepare and file the report and recommendation within the time directed by the court. In making the report and recommendation, the probation officer shall consider factors such as the maturity of the minor, the reasons for the minor’s refusal to take the oath or to testify, the probability that available sanctions will affect the decision of the minor not to take the oath or not to testify, the potential impact on the minor of his or her testimony, the potential impact on the pending litigation of the minor’s unavailability as a witness, and the appropriateness of the various available sanctions in the minor’s case. The court shall consider the report and recommendation in imposing a sanction in the case.

(b) A victim of a sex crime who is subject to subdivision (a) shall meet with a victim advocate, as defined in Section 679.04 of the Penal Code, unless the court, for good cause, finds that it is not in
 the best interest of the victim.

(c) In any case in which the court orders the minor to be placed outside of his or her home, the placement shall be in the least restrictive setting available. Except as provided in subdivision (e), the court shall not order the minor to be placed in a secure facility unless other placements have been made and the minor has fled the custody and control of the person under the control of whom he or she has been placed or has persistently refused to obey the reasonable and proper orders or directions of the person under the control of whom he or she has been placed.

(d) The court may impose a sanction for contempt prior to receipt of the report and recommendation required by subdivision (a) if the court enters a finding, supported by specific facts stated on the record, that the minor would be likely to flee if released before the receipt of the
 report and recommendation.

(e) The court may order the minor placed in a secure facility without first attempting the nonsecure placement required by subdivision (c) if the court enters a finding, supported by specific facts stated on the record, that the minor would be likely to flee if released to nonsecure placement as a prerequisite to secure confinement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   (SB 1248)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1220.

When the warrant of arrest has been returned served, if the person arrested does not appear on the return day, the court or judge may issue another warrant of arrest or may order the undertaking to be enforced, or both. If the undertaking is enforced, the measure of damages is the extent of the loss or injury sustained by the aggrieved party by reason of the misconduct for which the warrant was issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

1221.

Whenever, by the provisions of this title, an officer is required to keep a person arrested on a warrant of attachment in custody, and to bring him before a court or judge, the inability, from illness or otherwise, of the person to attend, is a sufficient excuse for not bringing him up; and the officer must not confine a person arrested upon the warrant in a prison, or otherwise restrain him of personal liberty, except so far as may be necessary to secure his personal attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1737.)
-------------------------------------------

1222.

The judgment and orders of the court or judge, made in cases of contempt, are final and conclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1737.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 7. EMINENT DOMAIN LAW [1230.010. - 1273.050.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [1230.010. - 1230.070.]

1230.010.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the Eminent Domain Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1230.020.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute, the power of eminent domain may be exercised only as provided in this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1230.030.

Nothing in this title requires that the power of eminent domain be exercised to acquire property necessary for public use. Whether property necessary for public use is to be acquired by purchase or other means or by eminent domain is a decision left to the discretion of the person authorized to acquire the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1230.040.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, the rules of practice that govern civil actions generally are the rules of practice for eminent domain proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1230.050.

The court in which a proceeding in eminent domain is brought has the power to:

(a) Determine the right to possession of the property, as between the plaintiff and the defendant, in accordance with this title.

(b) Enforce any of its orders for possession by appropriate process. The plaintiff is entitled to enforcement of an order for possession as a matter of right.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1230.060.

Nothing in this title affects any other statute granting jurisdiction over any issue in eminent domain proceedings to the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1230.065.

(a) This title becomes operative July 1, 1976.

(b) This title does not apply to an eminent domain proceeding commenced prior to January 1, 1976. Subject to subdivisions (c) and (d), in the case of an eminent domain proceeding which is commenced on or after January 1, 1976, but prior to the operative date, this title upon the operative date applies to the proceeding to the fullest extent practicable with respect to issues to be tried or retried.

(c) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1240.010), Chapter 4 (commencing with
 Section 1245.010), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1250.010) do not apply to a proceeding commenced prior to the operative date.

(d) If, on the operative date, an appeal, motion to modify or vacate the verdict or judgment, or motion for new trial is pending, the law applicable thereto prior to the operative date governs the determination of the appeal or motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1230.070.

No judgment rendered prior to the operative date of this title in a proceeding to enforce the right of eminent domain is affected by the enactment of this title and the repeal of former Title 7 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Principles of Construction; Definitions [1235.010. - 1235.210.]



  ARTICLE 1. Construction [1235.010. - 1235.070.]

1235.010.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, these preliminary provisions and rules of construction shall govern the construction of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.020.

Chapter, article, and section headings do not in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.030.

Whenever any reference is made to any portion of this title or to any other statute, such reference shall apply to all amendments and additions heretofore or hereafter made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.040.

Unless otherwise expressly stated:

(a) “Chapter” means a chapter of this title.

(b) “Article” means an article of the chapter in which that term occurs.

(c) “Section” means a section of this code.

(d) “Subdivision” means a subdivision of the section in which that term occurs.

(e) “Paragraph” means a paragraph of the subdivision in which that term
occurs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.050.

The present tense includes the past and future tenses; and the future, the present.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.060.

“Shall” is mandatory and “may” is permissive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.070.

If any provision or clause of this title or application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the title that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Words and Phrases Defined [1235.110. - 1235.210.]

1235.110.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, these definitions govern the construction of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.120.

“Final judgment” means a judgment with respect to which all possibility of direct attack by way of appeal, motion for a new trial, or motion under Section 663 to vacate the judgment has been exhausted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.125.

When used with reference to property, “interest” includes any right, title, or estate in property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.130.

“Judgment” means the judgment determining the right to take the property by eminent domain and fixing the amount of compensation to be paid by the plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.140.

“Litigation expenses” includes both of the following:

(a) All expenses reasonably and necessarily incurred in the proceeding in preparing for trial, during trial, and in any subsequent judicial proceedings.

(b) Reasonable attorney’s fees, appraisal fees, and fees for the services of other experts where such fees were reasonably and necessarily incurred to protect the defendant’s interests in the proceeding in preparing for trial, during trial, and in any subsequent judicial proceedings whether such fees were incurred for services rendered
before or after the filing of the complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.150.

“Local public entity” means any public entity other than the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.155.

“Nonprofit, special use property” means property which is operated for a special nonprofit, tax-exempt use such as a school, church, cemetery, hospital, or similar property. “Nonprofit, special use property” does not include property owned by a public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 7, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.160.

“Person” includes any public entity, individual, association, organization, partnership, trust, limited liability company, or corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.165.

“Proceeding” means an eminent domain proceeding under this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.170.

“Property” includes real and personal property and any interest therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.180.

“Property appropriated to public use” means property either already in use for a public purpose or set aside for a specific public purpose with the intention of using it for such purpose within a reasonable time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.190.

“Public entity” includes the state, a county, city, district, public authority, public agency, and any other political subdivision in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.193.

“Electric, gas, or water public utility property” means property appropriated to a public use by a public utility, as defined in Section 218, 222, or 241 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 812, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.195.

“Resolution” includes ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.200.

“State” means the State of California and includes the Regents of the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1235.210.

“Statute” means a constitutional provision or statute, but does not include a charter provision or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. The Right to Take [1240.010. - 1240.700.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Limitations on Exercise of Power of Eminent Domain [1240.010. - 1240.055.]

1240.010.

The power of eminent domain may be exercised to acquire property only for a public use. Where the Legislature provides by statute that a use, purpose, object, or function is one for which the power of eminent domain may be exercised, such action is deemed to be a declaration by the Legislature that such use, purpose, object, or function is a public use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1240.020.

The power of eminent domain may be exercised to acquire property for a particular use only by a person authorized by statute to exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire such property for that use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1240.030.

The power of eminent domain may be exercised to acquire property for a proposed project only if all of the following are established:

(a) The public interest and necessity require the project.

(b) The project is planned or located in the manner that will be most compatible with the greatest public good and the least private injury.

(c) The property sought to be acquired is necessary for the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1240.040.

A public entity may exercise the power of eminent domain only if it has adopted a resolution of necessity that meets the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1245.210) of Chapter 4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1240.050.

A local public entity may acquire by eminent domain only property within its territorial limits except where the power to acquire by eminent domain property outside its limits is expressly granted by statute or necessarily implied as an incident of one of its other statutory powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1240.055.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Conservation easement” means a conservation easement as defined in Section 815.1 of the Civil Code and recorded as required by Section 815.5 of the Civil Code.

(2) “Holder of a conservation easement” means the entity or organization that holds the
conservation easement on the property that is proposed for acquisition and that is authorized to acquire and hold conservation easements pursuant to Section 815.3 of the Civil Code.

(3) “Property appropriated to public use,” as used in Article 6 (commencing with Section 1240.510) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 1240.610), includes a conservation easement if any of the following applies:(A) The conservation easement is held by a public entity.

(B) A public entity provided funds, not including the value of a charitable contribution for federal or state income tax purposes but including the California Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit, for the acquisition of that easement. 

(C) A public entity imposed conditions on approval or permitting of a project that were satisfied, in whole or in part, by the conservation easement. 

(b) A person authorized to acquire property for public use by eminent domain shall exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire property that is subject to a conservation easement only as provided in this section.

(c) Not later than 105 days prior to the hearing held pursuant to Section 1245.235, or at the time of the offer made to the owner or owners of record pursuant to Section 7267.2 of the Government Code, whichever occurs earlier, the person seeking to acquire property subject to a conservation easement shall give notice to the holder of the conservation easement as provided in this subdivision. If the person is not required to hold a hearing pursuant to Section 1245.235, then the notice shall be given 105 days prior to the time of the offer made to the owner or owners of record pursuant to Section 7267.2 of the Government Code.

(1) The notice required by subdivision (c) shall be sent by first-class mail and shall state all of the following:

(A) A general description, in text or by diagram, of the property subject to a conservation easement that the person proposes to acquire by eminent domain.

(B) A description of the public use or improvement that the person is considering for the property subject to a conservation easement.

(C) That written comments on the acquisition may be submitted in accordance with paragraph (3) no later than 45 days from the date the person seeking to acquire the property mailed the notice to the holder of the conservation easement.

(D) That the holder of the conservation easement, within 15
days of receipt of the notice required by subdivision (c), is required, under certain circumstances, to do all of the following:

(i) Send a copy of the notice by first-class mail to each public entity that provided funds for the purchase of the easement or that imposed conditions on approval or permitting of a project that were satisfied, in whole or in part, by the creation of the conservation easement.

(ii) Inform the public entity that written comments on the acquisition may be submitted in accordance with paragraph (3).

(iii) Notify the person seeking to acquire the property of the name and address of any public entity that was sent a copy of the notice pursuant to this paragraph.

(2) (A) The holder of the conservation
easement, within 15 days of receipt of the notice required by subdivision (c), shall do all of the following:

(i) Send a copy of the notice by first-class mail to each public entity that provided funds for the purchase of the easement or that imposed conditions on approval or permitting of a project that were satisfied, in whole or in part, by the creation of the conservation easement.

(ii) Inform the public entity that written comments on the acquisition may be submitted in accordance with paragraph (3).

(iii) Notify the person seeking to acquire the property of the name and address of any public entity that was sent a copy of the notice pursuant to this paragraph.

(B) Subparagraph (A) shall apply only if one of the following applies:

(i) The holder of the easement is the original grantee of the conservation easement and there is a public entity as described in subparagraph (A).

(ii) The holder of the easement has actual knowledge of a public entity as described in subparagraph (A).

(iii) Recorded documents evidence the identity of a public entity as described in subparagraph (A).

(3) The holder of the conservation easement or the public entity receiving notice, or both, may provide to the person seeking to acquire the property written comments on the acquisition, including identifying any potential conflict between the public use proposed for the property and the purposes and terms of the conservation easement. Written comments on the acquisition may be submitted no later than 45 days
from the date the person seeking to acquire the property mailed the notice to the holder of the conservation easement.

(d) The person seeking to acquire the property subject to a conservation easement, within 30 days after receipt of written comments from the holder of the conservation easement or from a public entity described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), shall respond in writing to the comments. The response to the comments shall be mailed by first-class mail to each easement holder or public entity that filed comments.

(e) The notice of the hearing on the resolution of necessity, pursuant to Section 1245.235, shall be sent by first-class mail to the holder of any conservation easement and to any public entity whose name and address are provided as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) and shall state that they have the right to appear and be heard on the matters
referred to in Sections 1240.030, 1240.510, and 1240.610. The notice shall state that, pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1245.235, failure to file a written request to appear and be heard within 15 days after the notice was mailed will result in waiver of the right to appear and be heard. The resolution of necessity to acquire property subject to a conservation easement shall refer specifically either to Section 1240.510 or 1240.610 as authority for the acquisition of the property.

(f) In any eminent domain proceeding to acquire property subject to a conservation easement, the holder of the conservation easement:

(1) Shall be named as a defendant, as set forth in Section 1250.220.

(2) May appear in the proceedings, as set forth in Section 1250.230.

(3) Shall have all the same rights and obligations as any other defendant in the eminent domain proceeding.

(g) (1) The holder of the conservation easement is an owner of property entitled to compensation determined pursuant to Section 1260.220 and Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1263.010) and in accordance with all of the following:
